Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.095

Co-personal representatives—Powers.

Except as otherwise provided by the probated will or by order of a court, all of the provisions of RCW 11.98.016 regarding the exercise of powers by co-trustees of a trust shall apply to the co-personal representatives of an estate in which the co-personal representatives have been granted nonintervention powers, as if, for purposes of the interpretation of that law, co-personal representatives were co-trustees and an estate were a trust.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4011; 1997 c 252 s 67.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.